Utah statutes.
79-3-201.   Establishment of survey within the department -- General supervision of the survey.

The survey is established within the department under:

(1)  the administration and general supervision of the executive director; and

(2)  the policy direction of the board.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

